District of Columbia statutes.
22-3020.55

Immunity from liability.

(a)

Any person who in good faith makes a report pursuant to this subchapter shall have immunity from liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed with respect to the making of the report or any participation in any judicial proceeding involving the report. In all civil or criminal proceedings concerning the child or resulting from the report, good faith shall be presumed unless rebutted.

(b)

Any person who makes a good-faith report pursuant to this subchapter and, as a result thereof, is discharged from his or her employment or in any other manner discriminated against with respect to compensation, hire, tenure, or terms, conditions, or privileges of employment, may commence a civil action for appropriate relief. If the court finds that the person is an individual who was required to report, who in good faith made a report, and who was discharged or discriminated against as a result, the court may issue an order granting appropriate relief, including reinstatement with back pay. The District may intervene in any action commenced under this subsection.

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 255
as added June 8, 2013, D.C. Law 19-315, § 4, 60 DCR 1702
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-315 added this section.